apertium-sme-fin.sme.lexc
LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI
gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#gávcci%> K ;
gávcci+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#gávcci%>n K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#gávcci%> K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#gávcci%> K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#gávcci»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#gávcci%>s K ;
 gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#gávcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#gákcá%>j K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#gávcci%>t K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#gávcci%>jde K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#gávcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIOVCCI
ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Ess:%>#logi#ovcci%>n K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#ovcci%>  K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#ovcci»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#ovcci%>s K ;
 ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#ovcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#okcá%>j K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#ovcci%>t K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#ovcci%>jde K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#ovcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIOVCCI
ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Ess:%>#logi#ovcci%>n K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#ovcci%>  K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#ovcci»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#ovcci%>s K ;
 ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#ovcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#okcá%>j K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#ovcci%>t K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#ovcci%>jde K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#ovcci%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIOVCCI
ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#ovcci%>n K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#ovcci»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#ovcci%>s K ;
 ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#ovcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#okcá%>j K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#ovcci%>t K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#ovcci%>jde K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#ovcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIOVCCI
ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#ovcci%>n K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#ovcci%> K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#ovcci»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#ovcci%>s K ;
 ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#ovcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#okcá%>j K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#ovcci%>t K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#ovcci%>jde K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#ovcci%>jguin K ;


LEXICON NUBBENUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e%>X4#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:i%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:i%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:i%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ess:i%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON NUBBEGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:i%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:i%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X4t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:i%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:i%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ess:i%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
nubbe#nuppe#lohkái:nubb NUBBENUPPELOHKAI ;
nubbe#goalmmát#lohkái:nubb NUBBEGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 21TO99
guok0te#logi#:guok't GUOKTELOGIOVCCI ;
golbma#logi#:golbma GOLBMALOGIOVCCI ;
njeallje#logi#:njeallj GUOKTELOGIOVCCI ;
vihtta#logi#:vi VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI ;
vihtta#logi#:vi VIHTTALOGIOVCCI ;
guhtta#logi#:gu VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI ;
guhtta#logi#:gu VIHTTALOGIOVCCI ;
čieža#logi#:čieža GOLBMALOGIOVCCI ;
gieža#logi#:gieža GOLBMALOGIOVCCI ;
gávcci#logi#:gák'ci GAVCCILOGIOVCCI ;
ovcci#logi#:ok'ci GAVCCILOGIOVCCI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
nubbe#nuppe#lohkái:nubb NUBBENUPPELOHKAI ;
nubbe#goalmmát#lohkái:nubb NUBBEGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
